Massachusetts, session 194th, H5292.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 116C of Chapter 164 of the General Laws, as inserted by Section 79 of Chapter
239 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking subsection (c) and inserting in place
thereof the following subsection:
(c) Electric customers may opt out of inclusion in the implementation of advanced
metering infrastructure with notice to the distribution company. Upon receiving such notice, the
distribution company shall remove the customer from the implementation plan and notify the
department of the customer’s decision to opt out of such implementation plan in a manner
determined by the department. The distribution company may charge such a customer any
reasonable and necessary fees for delivering non-advanced metering service, provided, however,
that said fees shall adhere to a uniform statewide rate established by the department that shall be
applied uniformly across all utility companies as determined by the department.
of 1